Arkansas, session 2025, HB1015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Dependent child tax credit.
(a) As used in this section, "qualifying child" means the same as
defined in 26 U.S.C. §152(c), as it existed on January 1, 2025, except that
"qualifying child" only includes an individual who has not attained the age
of eighteen (18) as of the end of the taxable year.
(b)(1) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income tax
imposed by this chapter in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300) per
qualifying child for an individual taxpayer having net income up to one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or taxpayers filing a joint income tax
return having a net income up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).
(2) If both spouses filing separately on the same income tax
return claim the income tax credit allowed under this section, the amount of
the income tax credit shall be allocated in equal amounts between the
taxpayers.
*CEB012*
01-16-2025 13:51:38 CEB012

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1015
(c)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall adjust annually the credit provided under subsection (b) of this
section by the cost-of-living adjustment for the current calendar year,
rounding the amount to the nearest whole dollar.
(2)(A) For the purposes of subdivision (c)(1) of this section,
the cost-of-living adjustment for a calendar year is the percentage, if any,
by which the Consumer Price Index for the current calendar year exceeds the
Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar year.
(B) If the Consumer Price Index for the current calendar
year does not exceed the Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar
year, the credit shall not be adjusted.
(3) As used in this subsection, "Consumer Price Index" means the
last Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the United
States Department of Labor.
(d) If the amount of the income tax credit allowed under this section
exceeds the taxpayer's income tax liability, the excess shall be refunded to
the taxpayer.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/D.Garner














01-16-2025 13:51:38 CEB012